Utah statutes.
26-4-23.   Authority of examiner to provide organ or other tissue for transplant purposes.

(1) When requested by the licensed physician of a patient who is in need of an organ or other tissue for transplant purpose, by a legally created Utah eye bank, organ bank or medical facility, the medical examiner may provide an organ or other tissue if:

(a)  a decedent who may provide a suitable organ or other tissue for the transplant is in the custody of the medical examiner;

(b)  the medical examiner is assured that the requesting party has made reasonable search for and inquiry of next of kin of the decedent and that no objection by the next of kin is known by the requesting party; and

(c)  the removal of the organ or other tissue will not interfere with the investigation or autopsy or alter the post-mortem facial appearance.

(2)  When the medical examiner is in custody of a decedent who may provide a suitable organ or other tissue for transplant purposes, he may contact the appropriate eye bank, organ bank or medical facility and notify them concerning the suitability of the organ or other tissue. In such contact the medical examiner may disclose the name of the decedent so that necessary clearances can be obtained.

(3)  No person shall be held civilly or criminally liable for any acts performed pursuant to this section.

